Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-142
Violations; penalty.

Any person who (1) trespasses upon any campground, armory, airport or any other place devoted to military duty; (2) unlawfully molests, insults, abuses or obstructs any member of the Nebraska National Guard while in the performance of his military duty; (3) interrupts or disturbs the orderly discharge of military duty; or (4) disturbs or prevents the passage of troops going to or returning from any duty shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Upon probable cause, any person suspected of violating this section may be detained by or at the direction of the commanding officer of the troops or of the place concerned.

The Adjutant General may cause any person so detained in accordance with the provisions of this section to be released to the civil authorities for prosecution.

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 40, p. 1594;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 50.